Hawaii statutes.
[§128A-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Attack" means any attack or series
of attacks by anyone causing, or which may cause, damage or injury to persons
or property in the United States in any manner by the use of chemical,
biological, radiological, nuclear, explosives, firearms, cyber, or other
weapons or processes; and any form of hostile action.

"County" means any of the political
subdivisions of the State, including the counties of Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai
and the city and county of Honolulu, but does not include the county of
Kalawao.

"Director of homeland security" or
"director" means the adjutant general.

"Facilities", except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, includes buildings and other structures, shelters,
land, and appurtenant materials.

"Homeland security" means a concerted
effort to:

(1) Prevent terrorist attacks within the United
States;

(2) Reduce the State's vulnerability to attacks and
terrorist activities; and

(3) Minimize the damage and recover from attacks that
occur.

"Necessary" means any methods,
measures, or other actions or determinations as are needed in the opinion of
the governor, or the governor's authorized representative, or a mayor, or a mayor's
authorized representative.

"States" includes the several states
of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the possessions and
territories of the United States. [L 2013, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next